include/feats/currency.foma
# Copyright (C) 2024-2026  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# proposal: Currency support with documentation.
# Author: Matthew C.
# Currencies and formats.
define dollar %$ ; 
define eur %€ ; 
define NZNum 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define zNum %0|NZNum ; 
define 2dFormat %0 zNum ; # 2digit format. 00, 01, 02... 09.
define DollarFormat %0|NZNum zNum^<12 ; # Dollars must be less than 999999999999, unless you're a millionaire.
define CentFormat [2dFormat|NZNum zNum]^<2 ; # Cents must be less than 100, 1 to 99.
define UnformattedNum NZNum zNum* ; 
define CurrencyFormat 
# For now, this is independent. In a near future, we could consider to merge this format into numbers and tokenizer.
[[dollar|eur] DollarFormat %, CentFormat] ; 

# Parsing the currency using tags:

define TagCurrency 
# First part: dollars and euros handling, singular and plural.
# if $0, remove it. Cents only.
[[dollar|eur] %0 %,] @-> 0 || .#. _ ,, 
# Ds1: dollar, in singular.
[..] -> ds1 || dollar 1 _ %, ,, 
# dp1: dollars, in plural.
[..] -> dp1 || dollar [UnformattedNum - 1|%0] _ %, ,, 
# ds2: eur, in singular.
[..] -> ds2 || eur 1 _ %, ,, 
# dp2: eurs, in plural
[..] -> dp2 || eur [UnformattedNum - 1|%0] _ %, ,, 
# dec: complement, which means and, with, etc, or empty.
%, -> ... dec || DollarFormat _ CentFormat ,, 
# second part: cents handling, singular and plural.
# cs1: cent, in singular, for dollar(s).
[%0 1] -> ... cs1 || dollar DollarFormat %, _ .#. ,, 
# cs2: cent, in singular, for euro(s).
[%0 1] -> ... cs2 || eur DollarFormat %, _ .#. ,, 
# cp1: cents, in plural, for dollar(s).
[CentFormat - [%0 1]] -> ... cp1 || dollar DollarFormat %, _ .#. ,, 
# cp2: cents, in plural, for euro(s).
[CentFormat - [%0 1]] -> ... cp2 || eur DollarFormat %, _ .#. ; 

define TranslateCurrency 
# Translators, please take care of this:
# Spanish: singular number:
# A single dollar or euro.
1 -> un || _ [ds1|ds2] ,, 
# A single cent, either with dollar or euro.
[%0 1] -> un || _ [cs1|cs2] ,, 
# Remove the zero in cents, the 2digit format. We want the single digit.
%0 -> 0 || _ [NZNum - 1] cp1|cp2 ,, 
# Translate those two currency parts, from tags to human readable strings, which are already commented in the previous definition.
ds1 -> dólar ,, 
ds2 -> euro ,, 
dp1 -> dólares ,, 
dp2 -> euros ,, 
dec -> con ,, 
cs1 -> centabo ,, 
cs2 -> céntimo ,, 
cp1 -> centabos ,, 
cp2 -> céntimos ,, 
# And remove symbols, not needed in the output.
[dollar|eur|%,] -> 0 ; 

regex 
CurrencyFormat .o. 
TagCurrency .o. 
TranslateCurrency ; 
